Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Promotion of Projects for Treatment of Solid and Hazardous Wastes

§ 17-17-101.
Legislative intent as to promotion of projects for treatment of solid and hazardous wastes; certificate of public convenience and necessity; approval by Department of Environmental Quality and Mississippi Development Authority required for certain projects.

It is the intent of the Legislature by the passage of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 to authorize municipalities to acquire, own and lease a project for the purpose of promoting the construction and installation of projects for the sale, collection, treatment, processing, reprocessing, generation, distribution, recycling, elimination, or disposal of solid and hazardous waste products, as hereinafter defined, by inducing manufacturing and industrial enterprises, qualified persons, firms, or corporations to locate and construct said projects in this state. It is intended that each project be self-liquidating. Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 shall be construed to conform with its intent. Except as otherwise provided for projects to recycle solid waste products, the powers hereby conferred upon the municipalities shall be exercised only after such municipality has obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Mississippi Board of Economic Development as provided in Sections 57-1-19, 57-1-21, 57-1-23 and 57-1-27; provided, however, that if a project is constructed solely with revenue bonds the board shall not be required to adjudicate that there are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality, solely for the purposes authorized by Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135, shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of the property in the municipality. The powers conferred in this section to municipalities for projects to recycle or sell recycled solid waste products shall be exercised only after such project has been approved by the Department of Environmental Quality and the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 587, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 17-17-103.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions which follow govern the construction and meaning of the terms used in Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135:

“Bonds” shall include notes, bonds and other written obligations authorized to be issued under Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135.

“Governing board” shall mean the governing bodies of the several counties and incorporated municipalities of the state as now or hereafter constituted, acting jointly or severally, and in the event that a project is located in more than one (1) county, the term “governing board” shall also refer to the governing bodies of the several counties wherein such project is located.

“Municipality” shall mean one or more counties or incorporated municipalities of this state, or any combination thereof, acting jointly or severally.

“Project” shall mean any real, personal or mixed property of any and every kind that can be used or that will be useful in controlling, collecting, storing, removing, handling, reducing, disposing of, treating and otherwise concerning solid or hazardous waste, including without limitation, property that can be used or that will be useful in extracting and converting waste to energy, encompassing the acquisition, handling, storage, and utilization of coal, lignite or any other fuel or water that can be used or that will be useful in converting waste to energy, and distributing such energy to users thereof, or otherwise separating and preparing waste for reuse.

“Solid wastes” shall mean any garbage, refuse, sludge from a waste treatment plant, water supply treatment plant or air pollution control facility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved material in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point sources subject to permits under section 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (86 Stat. 880), or source, special nuclear or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954.

“Hazardous wastes” shall mean any waste or combination of waste of a solid, liquid, contained gaseous, or semisolid form which because of its quantity, concentration or physical, chemical or infectious characteristics, may (i) cause, or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or (ii) pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed which are listed by the environmental protection agency as hazardous wastes which exceed the threshold limits set forth in the environmental protection agency regulations for classifying hazardous waste. Such wastes include, but are not limited to, those wastes which are toxic, corrosive, flammable, irritants, strong sensitizers, or which generate pressure through decomposition, heat or other means. Such wastes do not include those radioactive materials regulated pursuant to the Mississippi Radiation Protection Law of 1976, appearing in Section 45-14-1 et seq.

“Industry” shall mean any person, firm or corporation operating any enterprise or facility for the collection, treatment, processing, reprocessing, generation, distributing, recycling, elimination or disposal of any type of waste product from which operation conditions result in or pose a substantial present, future or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported or disposed of or otherwise managed.

“Authority” shall mean the Mississippi Department of Natural Resources.

“Lease/sale” shall mean any agreement without limitation whereby a municipality may lease and/or convey title of a project to an industry, made by and between the governing board and such industry by which such industry agrees to pay to (and to secure if so required) the municipality, or to any assignee thereof, as the case may be, the sums required to meet the payment of the principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, on any bonds, and/or the expenses, if any, of operation by such municipality or county.

“Board” shall mean the Mississippi Board of Economic Development.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-105.
Powers as to establishment of projects.

Upon compliance with procedures prescribed herein, and subject to the provisions of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135, any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered:

To acquire, purchase, construct, operate, maintain and replace a project;

To enlarge, expand and improve an existing project;

To issue bonds for the purpose of defraying the cost of the projects contemplated by subsections (a) and (b) of this section;

To enter into agreements with any industry situated in the municipality to construct, operate, maintain, repair and replace a project;

To enter into a lease/sale with an industry for the lease and/or sale of a project to such industry;

To accept any state or federal grant that may be available to defray any part of the cost of a project; provided, however, that the agreements contemplated by subsections (d) and (e) of this section shall contain terms and conditions under which the industry shall pay to the municipality, or trustee, if any, for the bonds contemplated by subsection (c) of this section, such sums of money and at such periods as will equal the aggregate of principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, due on the bonds and also the costs, if any, to the municipality of operating, maintaining, insuring, repairing and replacing a project or portions thereof, including a reasonable amount for reserves. Provided further, that any agreement contemplated by subsection (e) of this section shall further contain terms and conditions pursuant to which a project shall be conveyed to the industry.

[Repealed].

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 586, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1990).

§ 17-17-107.
Resolution for issuance of revenue bonds; notice of resolution; protest and election.

Before issuing any revenue bonds hereunder, the governing body of any municipality shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to so issue, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued, the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the governing body proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county in which such municipality is located. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such county. If twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the municipality shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held as herein provided. If no such protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the above-mentioned resolution. However, the governing body of such municipality, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on the question of the issuance of the bonds, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue bonds as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-109.
Notice of election.

Where an election is to be called as provided in Section 17-17-107, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the governing body of any municipality and shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for such election and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding such election at three (3) public places in such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-111.
Conduct of election.

The election provided for in Section 17-17-107 shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in municipalities. At such election, all qualified electors of such municipality may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-113.
Determination of election results; time of issuance of bonds.

When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such municipality and certified by them to the governing body of such municipality, it shall be the duty of such governing body to determine and adjudicate whether or not a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, and unless this is the case, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should a majority of the qualified electors who vote thereon in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the governing body of the municipality may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two (2) years from the date of such election, or within two (2) years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such governing body shall deem best.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-115.
Bond terms and specifications; validation.

The bonds issued by a municipality under authority of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 shall be limited obligations of such municipality. The principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, shall be payable solely out of the moneys to be derived by the municipality pursuant to the agreements specified in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 17-17-105. Revenue bonds and interest coupons issued under authority of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 shall never constitute an indebtedness of such municipality within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation and shall never constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality, or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such fact shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond. Such bonds may be executed and delivered at any time as a single issue or from time to time as several issues; may be in such form and denominations; may be of such tenor; may be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or both; may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date; may be subject to such terms of redemption; may be payable at such place or places; may bear interest at such rate or rates as the governing board and the industry shall agree upon, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103; and may contain such other provisions not inconsistent herewith, as the municipality may determine, all of which shall be provided in the proceedings authorizing the bonds. Any revenue bonds issued under the authority of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 may be sold at public or private sale at such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the governing board to be most advantageous, and the governing board may pay, as a part of the cost of acquiring any facilities out of the bond proceeds, all expenses, premiums and commissions with the authorization, sale and issuance thereof. All bonds issued under the authority of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135, except registered bonds which are registered otherwise than to bearer, and all interest coupons appurtenant thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that they are payable solely from a specified source. The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide for the issuance, in the future, of further bonds on a parity with those initially issued. Bonds issued hereunder shall be validated in the chancery court in which the municipality is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 8; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 17-17-117.
Security for bonds.

The principal, interest and premium, if any, on any bonds shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues payable to the municipality, pursuant to either of the agreements specified in subsections (d) and (e) of Section 17-17-105 and may also, in the case of an agreement under subsection (e) of Section 17-17-105, be secured by a lien which may be subordinate to a prior lien on any other property given as security by the industry pursuant to the lease/sale and any bonds may be issued pursuant to and secured by a trust indenture. The proceedings under which bonds are authorized to be issued or any such trust indenture may contain any agreements and provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions respecting the fixing and collection of the sums payable by the industry to the municipality and/or the trustee, if any, as the case may be, pursuant to the lease/sale, the maintenance and insurance of a project, the creation and maintenance of special funds by the industry, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default to the bondholders or to the trustee under such trust indenture, all as the governing board shall deem advisable. Provided, however, that in making any such agreements or provisions, no municipality shall have the power to obligate itself except with respect to any security pledged, mortgaged or otherwise made available by the industry for the securing of revenue bonds, and the application of the revenues from the agreement, made under either subsection (d) or (e) of Section 17-17-105 and shall not have the power to incur a pecuniary liability or a charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers. The proceedings authorizing any revenue bonds hereunder and any trust indenture securing such bonds may provide that in the event of default in payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds or in the performance of any agreement contained in such proceedings or trust indenture, such payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with such powers as may be necessary to enforce the obligations thereof. No breach of any such agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon any municipality, or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

The trustee or trustees under any trust indenture, or any depository specified by such trust indenture, may be such persons or corporations as the governing board shall designate, notwithstanding that they may be nonresidents of Mississippi or incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of other states of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-119.
Refunding bonds.

Any revenue bonds issued hereunder and at any time outstanding may at any time be refunded by a municipality by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the governing board may deem necessary, but not exceeding an amount sufficient to refund the principal of the bonds so to be refunded, together with any unpaid interest thereon and any premiums and commissions necessary to be paid in connection therewith. Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded shall have been matured or shall thereafter mature, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof for the payment of the bonds to be refunded thereby, or by exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded thereby, provided that the holders of any bonds so to be refunded shall not be compelled without their consent to surrender their bonds for payment or exchange prior to the date on which they are payable or, if they are called for redemption, prior to the date on which they are by their terms subject to redemption. Any refunding bonds issued under the authority of this section shall be payable solely from the revenues out of which the bonds to be refunded hereby were payable, and shall be subject to the provisions contained in Section 17-17-115, and may be secured in accordance with the provisions of Section 17-17-117.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-121.
Contracting for projects.

Contracts for acquisition, purchase, construction and/or installation of a project contemplated by Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 shall be effected in the manner prescribed by law for public contracts; provided, however, that where (a) the municipality finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 to enter into such contracts upon the basis of public bidding pursuant to advertising, (b) the industry concurs in such finding, and (c) such finding is approved by the board, public bidding pursuant to advertisement may be dispensed with and such contracts may be entered into based upon negotiation; and provided further, that the industry, at its option, may negotiate such contracts in the name of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-123.
Finding of necessity required before project is financed.

Prior to undertaking the financing of a project, the governing board shall obtain a finding of the authority that the facility is necessary and that the design thereof will result in the collection, processing, generation, distributing, recycling, elimination and/or disposal of any type of waste product from which operation conditions result in or pose a substantial present, future or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported or disposed of or otherwise managed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-125.
Covenants required of industries involved in construction or operation of waste treatment projects.

Every agreement under either subsection (d) or (e) of Section 17-17-105 shall contain a covenant obligating the industry to effect the completion of the project if the proceeds of the bonds, including parity completion bonds, if any, prove insufficient, and each such lease/sale shall obligate the industry to make payments which shall be sufficient to:

Pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued for the project;

Build and maintain any reserves deemed by the governing board to be advisable in connection therewith;

Pay the costs of maintaining the project in good repair and the cost of keeping it properly insured;

Provide proper, sufficient and adequate insurance to cover potential liability that could arise from project operation; and

Provide detailed plans to guarantee an environmentally sound operation and post-closure management of a project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-127.
Lease/sale agreements between municipalities and industries.

Any agreement made under subsection (e) of section 17-17-105 may provide that the project will be owned by the municipality, and leased to the industry; may provide the industry with an option to purchase the project upon such terms and conditions as the governing board and the industry shall agree upon, at a price which represents the fair market value at the time of purchase or may provide that the project shall become the property of the industry upon the acquisition thereof. Any such agreement may also, but is not required to, include a guaranty agreement whereby a corporation, foreign or domestic, other than the industry guarantees in whole or in part the obligations of the industry under the lease/sale upon such terms and conditions as the governing board may deem appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-129.
Use of bond proceeds; cost of project.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds issued under authority of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 shall be applied only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued; provided, however, that any premium and accrued interest received in any such sale shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds sold; and provided further, that if for any reason any portion of the proceeds shall not be needed for the purpose of which the bonds were issued, such unneeded portion of the proceeds shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds. The cost of acquiring any project shall be deemed to include the following:

The actual cost of the construction of any part of any project which may be constructed, including architect’s, engineer’s and legal fees;

The purchase price of any land necessary therefor;

The purchase price of any part of any project that may be acquired by purchase;

All expenses in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds to finance such acquisition; and

The interest on the bonds for a reasonable time prior to construction, during construction, and for not exceeding one (1) year after completion of the construction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-131.
Exemption from taxation.

The bonds authorized by Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 and the income therefrom, all trust indentures and mortgages executed as security therefor, all lease agreements made pursuant to the provisions hereof, and all projects, when owned by the municipality, and the revenues derived from any agreement with respect thereto shall be exempt from all taxation by the state of Mississippi, and by any political subdivision thereof, except for inheritance, estate or transfer taxes and except further the contractors tax levied by Section 27-65-21.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-133.
Petition prior to issuance of bonds; approval of petition; relationship with other provisions.

No bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 until the proposal of the governing board to issue the bonds shall receive the approval of the board. Whenever the governing board shall propose to issue bonds pursuant to the provisions of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135, it shall file its petition with the board, setting forth the following:

A description of the project proposed to be undertaken;

A statement setting forth the action taken by the Department of Natural Resources in connection with the project;

A reasonable estimate of the cost of the project;

A general summary of the terms and conditions of the lease/sale; and

Financial statements on lessee company.

Upon the filing of the petition the board shall, as soon as practicable, make such investigation as it deems advisable, and if it finds that the proposed project is intended to promote the purposes of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 and may be reasonably anticipated to effect such result, it shall be authorized to approve the projects.

Authority hereby vested in any governing board to issue, and the board to approve, bonds pursuant to and in accordance with Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 is supplemental to, and may be exercised in connection with Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, 57-1-71 through 57-1-83, 57-1-101 through 57-1-107, 57-3-1 through 57-3-33 and 57-5-1 through 57-5-23, it being the intent of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 that the bonds authorized by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, 57-1-101 through 57-1-107, 57-3-1 through 57-3-33 and 57-5-1 through 57-5-23 may be used for the purposes set forth in Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135 under the existing terms and conditions authorizing issuance of same, except that the governing board shall not be authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 17-17-135.
Rules and regulations.

The board is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 17-17-101 through 17-17-135, not inconsistent herewith.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 527, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1981.